Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4310
Privileged communication; presence of others; effect; prosecutor; duty.

Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 27, article 5, any communication with a victim which is privileged, whether by statute, court order, or common law, shall retain such privilege regardless of who is present during the communication so long as the victim has a privilege with respect to each individual present. Nothing in this section shall relieve the prosecutor of the prosecutor's duty to disclose and make known to the defendant or the defendant's attorney any and all exculpatory material or information suitable for impeachment which is known to the prosecutor.

Laws 2020, LB43, § 3.